Utah statutes.
54-7-9.   Complaints against utilities -- Scope.

(1)  When any public utility violates any provision of law or any order or rule of the commission:

(a)  the commission may file a notice of agency action; or

(b)  any person, corporation, chamber of commerce, board of trade, or any civic, commercial, mercantile, traffic, agricultural, or manufacturing organization or association, or any body politic or municipal corporation may file a request for agency action.

(2)  The notice or request shall specify the act committed or omitted by the public utility that is claimed to be in violation of the law or a rule or order of the commission.

(3)  No request for agency action shall be entertained by the commission concerning the reasonableness of any rates or charges of any gas, electrical, water, sewerage, or telephone corporation, unless the request is signed by:

(a)  the mayor, the president or chairman of the board of trustees, or the commissioners, or a majority of the council, commission, or other legislative body of the city, county, or town within which the alleged violation occurred; or

(b)  by not less than 25 consumers or purchasers, or prospective consumers or purchasers, of the gas, electricity, water, sewerage, or telephone service.

(4)  The commission need not dismiss any complaint because of the absence of direct damage to the complainant.

